Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 12. Palliative Care

History.

2017 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 9, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 194, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2017.

§ 35-1-1201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 55, § 2.

“Department” means the department of health;

“Palliative care” means:

Patient and family centered medical care that optimizes quality of life by anticipating, preventing and treating suffering caused by serious illness. Palliative care throughout the continuum of illness involves addressing the physical, emotional, spiritual and social needs of the patient and facilitates patient autonomy, access to information and choice. Palliative care includes, but is not limited to, discussion of the patient’s goals for treatment and discussion of appropriate treatment options including hospice care and comprehensive pain and symptom management when appropriate; and

Care for a terminal, potentially terminal or serious chronic illness that is designed to reduce adverse symptoms, reduce pain and suffering and improve quality of life without, by itself, seeking to cure the illness, prevent death or prolong life. Palliative care includes hospice care. Palliative care does not include treatment or procedures that are meant to hasten death.

History.

2017 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 9, 2017; 2022 ch. 55, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 55, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022, deleted “, unless the governor establishes the council within a different office or department pursuant to W.S.

35-1-1202

, in which case department means the office or department within which the governor establishes the council” at the end of (a)(ii); and repealed former (a)(i), which read, “‘Council’ means the advisory council on palliative care established pursuant to this article.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 194, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2017.

§ 35-1-1202.
Advisory council on palliative care. [Repealed]

History.

2017 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 9, 2017; 2018 ch. 106, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; repealed by 2022 ch. 55, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 35-1-1203.
Department duties.

The department shall:

Publish information and resources on its website, including links to external resources, concerning:

Palliative care providers and facilities;

Information about palliative care delivery in the home, community outpatient and inpatient settings;

Best practices for palliative care delivery;

Consumer education materials; and

Referral information for palliative care, including hospices.

Develop and implement, as appropriate and consistent with existing appropriations, other initiatives regarding palliative care services and education;

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 55, § 2.

History.

2017 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 9, 2017; 2022 ch. 55, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, repealed former (a)(iii), which read, “Consult with the council regarding the performance of its duties under this section.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 194, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2017.

§ 35-1-1204.
Mandatory report to legislature.

The department shall provide the legislature and the legislature’s joint labor, health and social services interim committee with a report by July 1, 2022. The report should contain recommendations as are appropriate concerning further palliative care initiatives. The department shall provide information necessary for the preparation of this report, provided the information requested is reasonable, economical and not otherwise protected by law. Concerned parties may either collaborate for the preparation of the report or provide their own reports. All reports received pursuant to this section shall be treated as public documents by the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the legislative service office.

History.

2017 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 9, 2017; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “on the success or failure of the council” at the end of the first sentence, deleted “recommendations to abolish, continue or modify the council and any other” following “should contain” in the second sentence, and deleted “and council” following “The department” in the third sentence.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 194, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2017.

§ 35-1-1205.
Sunset.

W.S.

35-1-1201

,

35-1-1203

and

35-1-1204

are repealed effective July 1, 2023.

History.

2017 ch. 194, § 1, effective March 9, 2017; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “35-1-1203 and” for “through” and made a related change.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 194, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2017.